District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.38

Zoning Commission powers.

Nothing in this part shall require the Zoning Commission to grant or deny an application for a zoning density increase.

History

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1499